Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,118
Apprentice salon license; change of ownership or location; effect.

Each apprentice salon license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and premises named thereon and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or location. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such apprentice salon may accept apprentices for training.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 118;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,157;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 380.